Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.070

Charitable contributions.

The program administrator may create additional legal entities and take such action as may be necessary or advisable to enable the fund to accept charitable contributions. In addition, the program administrator may provide technical assistance, information, and training to private employers and other potential donors to establish programs that facilitate charitable contributions to the fund including tobacco use premium surcharge programs.

[ 2018 c 4 s 7; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 8.]